New York, session 2025-2026, A10368.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (d), (e) and (f) of subdivision 1 of section 2 122-b of the general municipal law, paragraphs (d) and (f) as amended by 3 chapter 303 of the laws of 1980 and paragraph (e) as amended by section 4 2 of part KK of chapter 55 of the laws of 2022, are amended and a new 5 closing paragraph is added to read as follows: 6 (d) Establish a special district for the financing and operation of 7 general ambulance services as set forth by this section, whereby any 8 county, city, town or village, acting individually, or jointly with any 9 other county, city, town and/or village, through its governing body or 10 bodies, following applicable procedures as are required for the estab- 11 lishment of fire districts in article eleven of the town law or follow- 12 ing applicable procedures as are required for the establishment of joint 13 fire districts in article eleven-A of the town law, with such special 14 district being authorized by this section to be established in all or 15 any part of any such participating county or counties, town or towns, 16 city or cities and/or village or villages; 17 (e) Employ any combination of the methods authorized in paragraph (a), 18 (b) [or], (c) or (d); 19 [(e)] (f) A contract may be entered into pursuant to the provisions of 20 this section for the services of an emergency rescue and first aid squad 21 of a fire department or fire company which is subject to the provisions 22 of section two hundred nine-b of this chapter; 23 [(f)] (g) Consider prehospital emergency treatment as that care 24 provided by certified emergency medical technicians or certified 25 advanced emergency medical technicians certified pursuant to the 26 provisions of article thirty of the public health law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06723-01-5 A. 10368 2 1 Any county, city, town or village which establishes or participates in 2 a joint district pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subdivision shall 3 dissolve and abolish any preexisting local district serving the same 4 jurisdiction. 5 § 2. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 1 of section 122-b of the general 6 municipal law, as amended by chapter 303 of the laws of 1980, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 [(e)] (f) No contract shall be entered into pursuant to the provisions 9 of this section for the services of an emergency rescue and first aid 10 squad of a fire department or fire company which is subject to the 11 provisions of section two hundred nine-b of [the general municipal law] 12 this chapter; 13 § 3. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 720 to read 14 as follows: 15 § 720. Report on volunteer firefighter and ambulance services staff- 16 ing. 1. On or before the first day of January two thousand twenty-seven, 17 the commissioner, in consultation with the state office of fire 18 prevention and control, shall prepare and publish a report on the staff- 19 ing of volunteer firefighter and ambulance services in New York state. 20 Such report shall examine and evaluate the challenges and issues 21 concerning the recruiting and maintenance of trained, available staffing 22 by volunteer fire departments, districts and companies as well as for 23 volunteer ambulance districts and companies. Such report shall specif- 24 ically examine and evaluate the challenges and issues that are partic- 25 ular to rural areas of the state and areas with geographic challenges 26 such as mountains, waterways or limited transportation networks. 27 2. In addition to identifying challenges and issues concerning the 28 recruiting and maintenance of trained, available staffing by volunteer 29 fire departments, districts and companies as well as for volunteer ambu- 30 lance districts and companies across New York state, as required by 31 subdivision one of this section, such report shall also make recommenda- 32 tions on how to address and remediate the challenges and issues identi- 33 fied, with such recommendations being submitted to the governor, the 34 temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the 35 chair of the senate standing committee on local government and the chair 36 of the assembly standing committee on local government at the time of 37 the publishing of the report. 38 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 39 the amendments to paragraph (e) of subdivision 1 of section 122-b of the 40 general municipal law made by section one of this act shall be subject 41 to the expiration and reversion of such paragraph pursuant to section 4 42 of part KK of chapter 55 of the laws of 2022, when upon such date the 43 provisions of section two of this act shall take effect.